Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-507
Surplus building fund; disposition.

In case the amount so produced by the rate of tax so proposed and levied shall exceed the amount expended for the specific object for which the same was voted, it shall not therefor be held invalid, but such excess, after said buildings and furnishings are paid for, shall go into the county general fund.

Laws 1895, c. 27, § 7, p. 130;

R.S.1913, § 442;

C.S.1922, § 359;

C.S.1929, § 11-707;

R.S.1943, § 23-507.